Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-712
Bonds; not debt of State of Nebraska or political subdivision.

The bonds, notes, and other obligations of a joint authority shall not be a debt of the State of Nebraska or of the political subdivisions creating or otherwise interested in such joint authority, and neither the state nor any such political subdivision shall be liable thereon, nor shall such bonds be payable out of any funds other than funds of the joint authority issuing the same.

Laws 1969, c. 24, § 12, p. 216.